Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2902
Physicians; mutual insurance association; how incorporated; purpose.

Any ten or more physicians licensed under the Medicine and Surgery Practice Act may incorporate a mutual insurance association to insure member physicians, their professional corporations, partnerships, limited liability companies, agents, and employees against liability arising from rendering or failing to render professional services in the treatment or care of patients.

Laws 1976, LB 809, § 2;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 249;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1137.

Medicine and Surgery Practice Act, see section 38-2001.